Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 1
CONTROL AND LICENSING OF PET ANIMALS

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 12 of chapter 36, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this part 1 were repealed and reenacted in 1977, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 1 prior to 1977, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

30-15-101. Pet animal control and licensing.

The board of county commissioners of any county may adopt a resolution for the control and licensing of dogs and other pet animals as provided in this part 1. The resolution may:

Require licensing of dogs and other pet animals by owners and impose reasonable conditions and fees on the same. No registration permit or license shall be issued by any board of county commissioners unless and until the owner of a dog, cat, or ferret exhibits to the board or designated official a valid rabies vaccination certificate indicating the dog, cat, or ferret has been vaccinated against rabies by a licensed veterinarian. The county pet animal control resolution may exempt dogs, cats, or ferrets below a specified age from licensing and registration or vaccination requirements, or both; except that the recommendations of the department of public health and environment shall be followed concerning the minimum age for the vaccination.

Require that dogs and other pet animals be under control at all times and define "control", which may vary from time to time, place to place, and animal to animal;

Define "vicious dog" and "vicious animal";

Establish a dog pound, or other animal holding facility, and engage personnel to operate it and otherwise to enforce the county dog control resolution or any other resolution concerning the control of pet animals;

Provide for the impoundment of animals which are vicious, not under control, or otherwise not in conformity with the resolutions;

Establish terms and conditions for the release or other disposition of impounded animals;

Establish such other reasonable regulations and restrictions for the control of dogs and other pet animals as the board of county commissioners may deem necessary.

The control provisions of such resolution, as provided in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), shall not apply to dogs while actually working livestock, locating or retrieving wild game in season for a licensed hunter, or assisting law enforcement officers or while actually being trained for any of these pursuits.

In order to implement the provisions of this section, any county or municipality may enter into an intergovernmental agreement pursuant to the provisions of part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., to provide for the control, licensing, impounding, or disposition of dogs or other pet animals or to provide for the accomplishment of any other aspect of a county or municipal dog control or pet animal control licensing resolution or ordinance.

For purposes of this part 1, "pet animal" means and includes any animal owned or kept by a person for companionship or protection or for sale to others for such purposes. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (3), "pet animal" does not include wildlife, livestock used for any purpose or which is estray as defined in section 35-44-101, C.R.S., or animals which are owned or bought and sold through the efforts of those that are licensed, inspected, or both, by the United States Department of Agriculture, the Colorado department of agriculture, or both; however, nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to exempt such animals from county control regulations.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1443, § 1, effective July 7.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1239, § 10, effective May 22; (1)(a)(I) amended, p. 2799, § 556, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

IP(1)(a) and (1)(a)(I) amended, p. 773, § 55, effective June 1.

L. 2014:

IP(1)(a) and (1)(a)(I) amended, (HB 14-1313), ch. 368, p. 1758, § 1, effective August 6.

30-15-102. Violations - penalties.

Any violation of any provision of a county resolution adopted pursuant to this part 1 not involving bodily injury to any person is a petty offense. If authorized by the county resolution, the penalty assessment procedure provided in section 16-2-201 may be followed by an animal control officer or any arresting law enforcement officer for any such violation. As part of said county resolution authorizing the penalty assessment procedure, the board of county commissioners may adopt a graduated fine schedule for violations of said resolution not involving bodily injury to any person. Such graduated fine schedule may provide for increased penalty assessments for repeat offenses by the same individual.

Any offense involving bodily injury to any person by a dog or other pet animal shall be a class 2 misdemeanor, and any violator shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S., for each separate offense.

Whenever a county animal control officer has probable cause to believe that a violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section, of the county's dog control and licensing resolution, or of the county's resolution concerning the control of pet animals has been committed, the officer may issue a citation or summons and complaint to the violator, stating the nature of the violation with sufficient particularity to give notice of said charge to the violator.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1444, § 1, effective July 7.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 2028, § 33, effective July 7.

L. 87:

(3) amended, p. 617, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 417, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1240, § 11, effective May 22.

L. 2002:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1542, § 288, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2095, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3248, § 501, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 30-15-101 as it existed prior to 1977.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (1) and (2), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

30-15-103. Disposition of fines and forfeitures.

All fines and forfeitures for the violation of county resolutions adopted pursuant to this part 1 and all moneys collected by the county for licenses or otherwise shall be paid into the treasury of the county at such times and in such manner as may be prescribed by resolution; or, if there is no resolution providing for the payment, it shall be paid to the county treasurer at once.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1444, § 1, effective July 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 30-15-105 as it existed prior to 1977.

30-15-104. Liability for accident or subsequent disease from impoundment.

The board of county commissioners, city council, board of trustees, or other governing body of a municipality, any of their assistants or employees, or any other person authorized to enforce the provisions of any dog control resolution or ordinance or any resolution concerning the control of pet animals shall not be held responsible for any accident or subsequent disease that may occur to the animal in connection with the administration of the resolution or ordinance.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1444, § 1, effective July 7.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1241, § 12, effective May 22.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 30-15-104 as it existed prior to 1977.

30-15-105. Animal control officers - peace officer designation.

Personnel engaged in animal control, however titled or administratively assigned, may issue citations or summonses and complaints enforcing the county dog control resolution or any other county resolution concerning the control of pet animals or municipal ordinance without regard to the certification requirements of part 3 of article 31 of title 24, C.R.S. Personnel so engaged shall be included within the definition of "peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical service provider engaged in the performance of his or her duties" in section 18-3-201 (2), C.R.S. Nothing in this part 1 is intended to vest authority in any person so engaged to enforce any resolution, ordinance, or statute other than the county dog control resolution or any other county resolution concerning the control of pet animals or municipal ordinance.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire part R&RE, p. 1445, § 1, effective July 7.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 962, § 9, effective July 1, 1984.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1098, § 8, effective March 6.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1241, § 13, effective May 22.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1027, § 56, effective August 6.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1214), ch. 336, p. 1499, § 13, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 30-15-103 as it existed prior to 1977.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1992 act amending this section, see section 12 of chapter 167, Session Laws of Colorado 1992.